Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
708

OFFENSES
AGAINST PROPERTY RIGHTS

Part I. General Provisions Relating to
Offenses

Against Property Rights

Section

708-800 Definitions of terms in this chapter

708-801 Valuation of property or services

708-802 Property recovered in offenses against
property

rights

708-803 Habitual property crime

Part II. Burglary and Other Offenses of
Intrusion

708-810 Burglary in the first degree

708-811 Burglary in the second degree

708-812 Possession of burglar's tools

708-812.5 Burglary offenses; intent to commit
therein a

crime against a person or against
property rights

708-812.55 Unauthorized entry in a dwelling in the
first

degree

708-812.6 Unauthorized entry in a dwelling in the
second

degree

708-813 Criminal trespass in the first degree

708-814 Criminal trespass in the second degree

708-814.5 Criminal trespass onto public parks and

recreational grounds

708-815 Simple trespass

708-816 Defense to trespass

708-816.5 Entry upon the premises of a facility
utilized as

a sex, child, or spouse abuse shelter;
penalty

708-817 Burglary of a dwelling during an
emergency period

708-818 Burglary of a building during an
emergency period

Part III. Criminal Damage to Property

708-820 Criminal property damage in the first
degree

708-821 Criminal property damage in the second
degree

708-822 Criminal property damage in the third degree

708-823 Criminal property damage in the fourth
degree

708-823.5 Aggravated criminal property damage

708-823.6 Graffiti; sentencing

708-824 Failure to control widely dangerous
means

708-825 Criminal tampering; definitions of terms

708-826 Criminal tampering in the first degree

708-827 Criminal tampering in the second degree

708-828 Criminal use of a noxious substance

708-829 Criminal littering

Part IV. Theft and Related Offenses

708-830 Theft

708-830.5 Theft in the first degree

708-831 Theft in the second degree

708-832 Theft in the third degree

708-833 Theft in the fourth degree

708-833.5 Shoplifting

708-834 Defenses: unawareness of ownership;
claim of

right; household belongings; co-interest
not a

defense

708-835 Proof of theft offense

708-835.4 Unauthorized operation of a recording
device in

a motion picture theater

708-835.5 Theft of livestock

708-835.55 Theft; agricultural product; sentencing

708-835.6 Telemarketing fraud

708-835.7 Theft of copper

708-835.8 Theft of beer keg

708-836 Unauthorized control of propelled
vehicle

708-836.5 Unauthorized entry into motor vehicle in
the

first degree

708-836.6 Unauthorized entry into motor vehicle in
the

second degree

708-837 Failure to return a rental motor
vehicle; penalty

708-837.5 Failure to return leased or rented
personal

property; penalty

708-838 Removal of identification marks

708-839 Unlawful possession

708-839.5 Theft of utility services

708-839.55 Unauthorized possession of confidential
personal

information

708-839.6 Identity theft in the first degree

708-839.7 Identity theft in the second degree

708-839.8 Identity theft in the third degree

Part V. Robbery

708-840 Robbery in the first degree

708-841 Robbery in the second degree

708-842 Robbery; "in the course of
committing a theft"

Part VI. Forgery and Related Offenses

708-850 Definitions of terms in this part

708-851 Forgery in the first degree

708-852 Forgery in the second degree

708-853 Forgery in the third degree

708-854 Criminal possession of a forgery device

708-855 Criminal simulation

708-856 Obtaining signature by deception

708-857 Negotiating a worthless negotiable
instrument

708-858 Suppressing a testamentary or recordable
instrument

Part VII. Business and Commercial Frauds

708-870 Deceptive business practices

708-871 False advertising

708-871.5 False labeling of Hawaii-grown coffee

708-872 Falsifying business records

708-873 Defrauding secured creditors

708-874 Misapplication of entrusted property

708-875 Trademark counterfeiting

Part VIII. Offenses Affecting Occupations

708-880 Commercial bribery

708-881 Tampering with a publicly-exhibited
contest

Part IX. Computer Crime

708-890 Definitions

708-891 Computer fraud in the first degree

708-891.5 Computer fraud in the second degree

708-891.6 Computer fraud in the third degree

708-892 Computer damage in the first degree

708-892.5 Computer damage in the second degree

708-892.6 Computer damage in the third degree

708-893 Use of a computer in the commission of a
separate

crime

708-894 Forfeiture of property used in computer
crimes

708-895 Jurisdiction

708-895.5 Unauthorized computer access in the
first degree

708-895.6 Unauthorized computer access in the
second degree

708-895.7 Unauthorized computer access in the
third degree

Part X. Credit Card Offenses

708-8100 Fraudulent use of a credit card

708-8100.5 Fraudulent encoding of a credit card

708-8101 Making a false statement to procure
issuance of a

credit card

708-8102 Theft, forgery, etc., of credit cards

708-8103 Credit card fraud by a provider of goods
or services

708-8104 Possession of unauthorized credit card
machinery or

incomplete cards

708-8105 Credit card lists prohibited; penalty

708-8106 Defenses not available

Part XI. Monetary Laundering--Repealed

708-8120, 8121 Repealed

Part XII. Cable Television and
Telecommunication

Service Offenses

708-8200 Cable television service fraud in the
first degree

708-8201 Cable television service fraud in the
second degree

708-8202 Telecommunication service fraud in the
first degree

708-8203 Telecommunication service fraud in the
second degree

708-8204 Forfeiture of telecommunication service
device and

cable television service device

Part XIII. Arson

708-8251 Arson in the first degree

708-8252 Arson in the second degree

708-8253 Arson in the third degree

708-8254 Arson in the fourth degree

Part XIV. Unlicensed Contracting Offenses

708-8300 Unlicensed contracting activity

708-8301 Habitual unlicensed contracting
activity; felony

708-8302 Unlicensed contractor fraud

708-8303 Unlicensed contractor fraud in the first
degree

708-8304 Unlicensed contractor fraud in the
second degree

708-8305 Unlicensed contractor fraud; valuation
of property

Note

L 2001, c 91, §4 purports to amend this chapter.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next